sv: Detaljer för hårddisk: AI-driven; Säkerhetskopieringsprogram ingår; Integration av molnbaserad säkerhetskopiering; Kör hälsoövervakning; Utbytbar; Energibesparing; RAID-stöd; Stötsäker; Smart support; Temperaturövervakning; Vibrationsmotstånd; Övrigt
hu: Merevlemez jellemzői: AI-alapú; Biztonsági mentési szoftver mellékelve; Felhőalapú biztonsági mentés integrálása; Meghajtóállapot figyelése; Üzem közben cserélhető; Energiatakarékos; RAID-támogatás; Ütésálló; Intelligens támogatás; Hőmérséklet-figyelés; Rezgésálló; Egyéb
ro-RO: Caracteristici hard disk: Pe bază de AI; Software de backup inclus; Integrare backup în cloud; Monitorizarea stării unității; Hot swappable; Economie de energie; Suport RAID; Rezistență la șocuri; Suport inteligent; Monitorizarea temperaturii; Rezistență la vibrații; Altele
ja: ハードドライブの機能: AI搭載; バックアップソフトウェア付属; クラウドバックアップ統合; ドライブ正常性モニター; ホットスワップ対応; 省電力; RAIDサポート; 耐衝撃; スマートサポート; 温度モニター; 耐振動; その他
fr: Caractéristiques du disque dur: Doté d’une IA; Logiciel de sauvegarde inclus; Sauvegardes dans le cloud intégrées; Surveillance de la santé du disque; Remplaçables à chaud; Économie d’énergie; Prise en charge RAID; Antichocs; Prise en charge Smart; Gestion de la température; Résistance aux vibrations; Autre
bg-BG: Характеристики на твърдия диск: Задвижван от AI; Включен софтуер за архивиране; Интеграция на архивиране в облак; Наблюдение на състоянието на задвижването; С възможност за смяна по време на работа; Пестене на енергия; Поддръжка на RAID; Удароустойчив; Интелигентна поддръжка; Следене на температурата; Устойчивост на вибрации; Други
nl: Kenmerken harde schijf: AI-aangedreven; Back-upsoftware inbegrepen; Integratie van cloudback-ups; Bewaking van de gezondheid van het station; Hot-swap; Energiebesparend; RAID-ondersteuning; Schokbestendig; Slimme ondersteuning; Temperatuurbewaking; Trillingsbestendigheid; Andere
ru: Характеристики жесткого диска: На базе ИИ; ПО для резервного копирования в комплекте; Интеграция облачного резервного копирования; Мониторинг состояния диска; Возможность горячей замены; Энергосбережение; Поддержка RAID; Ударопрочный; Интеллектуальная поддержка; Мониторинг температуры; Устойчивость к вибрации; Другое
pt-BR: Recursos do disco rígido: Com IA; Software de backup incluído; Integração de backup em nuvem; Monitoramento de integridade do drive; Troca quente; Economia de energia; Suporte RAID; À prova de choque; Suporte inteligente; Monitoramento de temperatura; Resistência à vibração; Outro
sl-SI: Lastnosti trdega diska: Poganja UI; Priložena programska oprema za varnostno kopiranje; Integracija varnostnega kopiranja v oblaku; Spremljanje zdravja pogona; Hitra menjava; Varčevanje z energijo; RAID podpora; Odporno na udarce; Pametna podpora; Spremljanje temperature; Odpornost na vibracije; Drugo
pl: Funkcje dysku twardego: Obsługiwany przez sztuczną inteligencję; Dołączone oprogramowanie do tworzenia kopii zapasowych; Integracja kopii zapasowych; Monitorowanie stanu napędu; Możliwość wymiany bez wyłączania systemu; Oszczędzanie energii; Obsługa RAID; Wstrząsoodporny; Inteligentne wspomaganie; Monitorowanie temperatury; Odporność na wibracje; Inne
da: Harddiskfunktioner: AI-drevet; Backupsoftware inkluderet; Cloud-backup-integration; Køresundhedsovervågning; Hot-swappable; Strømbesparende; RAID-understøttelse; Stødsikker; Smart support; Temperaturovervågning; Vibrationsmodstand; Andet
de: Festplattenfunktionen: KI-gestützt; Backupsoftware im Lieferumfang enthalten; Cloud-Backup-Integration; Überwachung des Laufwerkszustands; Im Betrieb austauschbar; Energiesparend; RAID-Unterstützung; Stoßfest; Smart-Support; Temperaturüberwachung; Vibrationsbeständigkeit; Sonstiges
it: Funzionalità del disco rigido: Alimentato dall'intelligenza artificiale; Software di backup incluso; Integrazione del backup nel cloud; Promuovere il monitoraggio della salute; Sostituibile a caldo; Indicatore di risparmio energetico; Supporto RAID; Antiurto; Smart support; Monitoraggio della temperatura; Resistenza alle vibrazioni; Altro
fi: Kiintolevyn ominaisuudet: Tekoälyllä toimiva; Mukana varmuuskopiointiohjelmisto; Pilvivarmuuskopioinnin integrointi; Ajotilan seuranta; Käytön aikana vaihdettavissa; Virransäästö; RAID-tuki; Iskunkestävä; Älykäs tuki; Lämpötilan seuranta; Tärinänkestävyys; Muu
th: คุณลักษณะของฮาร์ดไดรฟ์: ขับเคลื่อนด้วย AI; มีซอฟต์แวร์สำรองข้อมูล; การผสานการทำงานการสำรองข้อมูลระบบคลาวด์; การตรวจสอบคุณภาพไดรฟ์; ถอดเปลี่ยนได้; ช่วยประหยัดพลังงาน; รองรับ RAID; กันกระแทก; รองรับโหมดอัจฉริยะ; การตรวจสอบอุณหภูมิ; ความต้านทานการสั่นสะเทือน; อื่นๆ
tr: Sabit sürücü özellikleri: Yapay zeka destekli; Yedekleme yazılımı dahil; Bulut yedekleme entegrasyonu; Sürücü sağlığı izleme; Çalışırken değiştirilebilir; Güç tasarrufu; RAID desteği; Darbeye dayanıklı; Akıllı destek; Sıcaklık izleme; Titreşim direnci; Diğer
zh-CN: 硬盘特点: AI 赋能; 带备份软件; 云备份集成; 驱动器健康监测; 支持热插拔; 省电; RAID 支持; 防震; 智能支持; 温度监测; 抗振; 其他
zh-TW: 硬碟特性: AI 驅動; 含備份軟體; 雲端備份整合; 行車健康監測; 支援熱插拔; 節省電力; RAID 支援; 防震; 智慧支援; 溫度監測; 抗震; 其他
el: Χαρακτηριστικά σκληρού δίσκου: Με τεχνολογία ΑΙ; Περιλαμβάνεται λογισμικό δημιουργίας αντιγράφων ασφαλείας; Ενσωμάτωση αντιγράφων ασφαλείας cloud; Παρακολούθηση της υγείας της μπαταρίας; Δυνατότητα εναλλαγής; Εξοικονόμηση ενέργειας; Υποστήριξη RAID; Αντικραδασμικό; Έξυπνη υποστήριξη; Παρακολούθηση θερμοκρασίας; Αντοχή σε κραδασμούς; Άλλο
nb: Harddiskfunksjoner: KI-drevet; Sikkerhetskopieringsprogramvare inkludert; Integrasjon av sikkerhetskopiering til skyen; Kjørehelseovervåking; Hot swappable; Strømsparing; RAID-støtte; Støtsikker; Smart støtte; Temperaturovervåking; Vibrasjonsmotstand; Annet
en: Hard drive features: AI-powered; Backup software included; Cloud backup integration; Drive health monitoring; Hot swappable; Power saving; RAID support; Shockproof; Smart support; Temperature monitoring; Vibration resistance; Other
cs: Vlastnosti pevného disku: S umělou inteligencí; Obsahuje zálohovací software; Integrace zálohování do cloudu; Monitorování stavu disku; Možnost výměny za provozu; Úspora energie; Podpora RAID; Nárazuvzdorný; Chytrá podpora; Monitorování teploty; Odolné proti vibracím; Jiné
pt-PT: Características do disco rígido: Alimentado por IA; Software de backup incluído; Integração de cópia de segurança em nuvem; Monitorização de estado de condução; Troca a quente; Poupança de energia; Suporte RAID; À prova de choque; Suporte inteligente; Monitorização da temperatura; Resistência à vibração; Outro
ko: 하드 드라이브 기능: AI 기반; 백업 소프트웨어 포함; 클라우드 백업 통합; 드라이브 상태 모니터링; 핫스왑 가능; 절전; RAID 지원; 충격 방지; 스마트 지원; 온도 모니터링; 내진성; 기타
es: Características del disco duro: Con tecnología de IA; Software de copia de seguridad incluido; Integración de copia de seguridad en la nube; Supervisión de estado del disco; Intercambiable en caliente; Ahorro de energía; Compatibilidad con RAID; A prueba de golpes; Soporte inteligente; Supervisión de temperatura; Resistencia a las vibraciones; Otros
vi: Tính năng ổ cứng: Hỗ trợ bởi AI; Bao gồm cả phần mềm sao lưu; Tích hợp sao lưu trên đám mây; Theo dõi tình hình ổ đĩa; Thay được nhanh; Tiết kiệm điện; Hỗ trợ RAID; Chống sốc; Hỗ trợ thông minh; Theo dõi nhiệt độ; Chống rung; Khác
lt-LT: Standžiojo disko ypatybės: Veikia DI pagrindu; Su atsargine programine įranga; Atsarginės kopijos debesyje integravimas; Disko būklės stebėjimas; Karštas keitimas; Energijos taupymas; RAID palaikymas; Atsparus smūgiams; Išmanusis palaikymas; Temperatūros stebėjimas; Atsparumas vibracijai; Kita
hr-HR: Značajke tvrdog diska: Pokreće umjetna inteligencija; Uključuje softver za sigurnosno kopiranje; Integracija sigurnosnog kopiranja s oblakom; Praćenje zdravlja pogona; Zamjena bez isključivanja napajanja; Štednja energije; Podrška za RAID; Otporno na udarce; Pametna podrška; Praćenje temperature; Otpornost na vibracije; Ostalo
sk-SK: Vlastnosti pevného disku: Podporovaný umelou inteligenciou; Vrátane zálohovacieho softvéru; Integrácia cloudového zálohovania; Monitorovanie zdravia disku; Vymeniteľné za chodu; Úspora energie; Podpora RAID; Nárazuvzdorný; Inteligentná podpora; Monitorovanie teploty; Odolnosť voči vibráciám; Iné